Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB822.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 10(ee) of the act of May 28, 1937 (P.L.955, No.265), referred to as the Housing Authorities Law, is amended to read:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Section 10. Powers of an Authority.--An Authority shall constitute a public body, corporate and politic, exercising public powers of the Commonwealth as an agency thereof, which powers shall include all powers necessary or appropriate to carry out and effectuate the purpose and provisions of this act, including the following powers, in addition to others herein granted:* * *(ee) In a county of the second class [and], city of the second class, city of the second class A and city of the third class, to appoint police officers who shall exercise the same powers that may be exercised under authority of law or ordinance by the police of the municipalities wherein the Authority is located, including, but not limited to, those powers conferred pursuant to 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 89 Subch. D (relating to municipal police jurisdiction) with respect to the property and enforcing order on and adjacent to the grounds and buildings of the Authority: Provided, That said police officers complete the same course of instruction as is required for municipal police officers by 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 Subch. D (relating to municipal police education and training) and receive certification by the Municipal Police Officers' Education and Training Commission as having completed the instruction. Said police officers shall maintain the certification as a condition of employment as police officers for the Authority.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0822PN0856 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627